Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 4. Rights of Third Parties.

Sec. 45.29.401.
Alienability of debtor’s rights.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section and AS

45.29.406

—

45.29.409

, whether a debtor’s rights in collateral may be voluntarily or involuntarily transferred is governed by law other than this chapter.

An agreement between the debtor and secured party that prohibits a transfer of the debtor’s rights in collateral or makes the transfer a default does not prevent the transfer from taking effect.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.402.
Secured party not obligated on contract of debtor or in tort.

The existence of a security interest, agricultural lien, or authority given to a debtor to dispose of or use collateral, without more, does not subject a secured party to liability in contract or tort for the debtor’s acts or omissions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.403.
Agreement not to assert defenses against assignee.

In this section, the issue of whether an assignment is taken for value is governed by the provisions of AS

45.03.303(a)

.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, an agreement between an account debtor and an assignor not to assert against an assignee a claim or defense that the account debtor may have against the assignor is enforceable by an assignee that takes an assignment

for value;

in good faith;

without notice of a claim of a property or possessory right to the property assigned; and

without notice of a defense or claim in recoupment of the type that may be asserted against a person entitled to enforce a negotiable instrument under AS

45.03.305(a)

.

The provisions of (b) of this section do not apply to defenses of a type that may be asserted against a holder in due course of a negotiable instrument under AS

45.03.305(b)

.

In a consumer transaction, if a record evidences the account debtor’s obligation, if law other than this chapter requires that the record include a statement to the effect that the rights of an assignee are subject to claims or defenses that the account debtor could assert against the original obligee, and if the record does not include the statement,

the record has the same effect as if the record included the statement; and

the account debtor may assert against an assignee the claims and defenses that would have been available if the record included the statement.

This section is subject to law other than this chapter that establishes a different rule for an account debtor who is an individual and who incurred the obligation primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

Except as otherwise provided in (d) of this section, this section does not displace law other than this chapter that gives effect to an agreement by an account debtor not to assert a claim or defense against an assignee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Collateral references. —

Validity, in contract for installment sale of consumer goods, or commercial paper given in connection therewith, of provision waiving, as against assignee, defenses good against seller, 39 ALR3d 518.

Sec. 45.29.404.
Rights acquired by assignee; claims and defenses against assignee.

Unless an account debtor has made an enforceable agreement not to assert defenses or claims, and subject to (b) — (e) of this section, the rights of an assignee are subject to

all terms of the agreement between the account debtor and assignor and a defense or claim in recoupment arising from the transaction that gave rise to the contract; and

any other defense or claim of the account debtor against the assignor that accrues before the account debtor receives a notification of the assignment authenticated by the assignor or the assignee.

Subject to (c) of this section and except as otherwise provided in (d) of this section, the claim of an account debtor against an assignor may be asserted against an assignee under (a) of this section only to reduce the amount the account debtor owes.

This section is subject to law other than this chapter that establishes a different rule for an account debtor who is an individual and who incurred the obligation primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

In a consumer transaction, if a record evidences the account debtor’s obligation, law other than this chapter requires that the record include a statement to the effect that the account debtor’s recovery against an assignee with respect to claims and defenses against the assignor may not exceed amounts paid by the account debtor under the record, and the record does not include the statement, the extent to which a claim of an account debtor against the assignor may be asserted against an assignee is determined as if the record included the statement.

This section does not apply to an assignment of a health care insurance receivable.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.405.
Modification of assigned contract.

A modification of or substitution for an assigned contract is effective against an assignee if made in good faith. The assignee acquires corresponding rights under the modified or substituted contract. The assignment may provide that the modification or substitution is a breach of contract by the assignor. This subsection is subject to (b) — (d) of this section.

The provisions of (a) of this section apply to the extent that the right to payment or the right to partial payment

under an assigned contract has not been fully earned by performance; or

has been fully earned by performance and the account debtor has not received notification of the assignment under AS

45.29.406(a)

.

This section is subject to law other than this chapter that establishes a different rule for an account debtor who is an individual and who incurred the obligation primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

This section does not apply to an assignment of a health care insurance receivable.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.406.
Discharge of account debtor; notification of assignment; identification and proof of assignment; restrictions on assignment of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, and promissory notes ineffective.

Subject to (b) — (i) of this section, an account debtor on an account, chattel paper, or a payment intangible may discharge its obligation by paying the assignor until, but not after, the account debtor receives a notification, authenticated by the assignor or the assignee, that the amount due or to become due has been assigned and that payment is to be made to the assignee. After receipt of the notification, the account debtor may discharge its obligation by paying the assignee and may not discharge its obligation by paying the assignor.

Subject to (h) of this section, notification is ineffective under (a) of this section

if it does not reasonably identify the rights assigned;

to the extent that an agreement between an account debtor and a seller of a payment intangible limits the account debtor’s duty to pay a person other than the seller and the limitation is effective under law other than this chapter; or

at the option of an account debtor, if the notification notifies the account debtor to make less than the full amount of any installment or other periodic payment to the assignee even if

only a portion of the account, chattel paper, or payment intangible has been assigned to that assignee;

a portion has been assigned to another assignee; or

the account debtor knows that the assignment to that assignee is limited.

Subject to (h) of this section, if requested by the account debtor, an assignee shall seasonably furnish reasonable proof that the assignment has been made. Unless the assignee complies, the account debtor may discharge its obligation by paying the assignor even if the account debtor has received a notification under (a) of this section.

Except as otherwise provided in (e) of this section, AS

45.29.407

, and AS

45.12.303

, and subject to (h) of this section, a term in an agreement between an account debtor and an assignor or in a promissory note is ineffective to the extent that it

prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of the account debtor or person obligated on the promissory note to the assignment or transfer of, or the creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of a security interest in, the account, chattel paper, payment intangible, or promissory note; or

provides that the assignment, transfer, creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of the security interest may give rise to a default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of termination, or remedy under the account, chattel paper, payment intangible, or promissory note.

The provisions of (d) of this section do not apply to the sale of a payment intangible or promissory note, other than a sale under a disposition under AS

45.29.610

or an acceptance of collateral under AS

45.29.620

.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.12.303

and AS

45.29.407

, and subject to (h) and (i) of this section, a rule of law, statute, or regulation that prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of a government, a governmental body or official, or an account debtor to the assignment or transfer of, or creation of a security interest in, an account or chattel paper is ineffective to the extent that the rule of law, statute, or regulation

prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of the government, governmental body or official, or account debtor to the assignment or transfer of, or the creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of a security interest in the account or chattel paper; or

provides that the assignment, transfer, creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of the security interest may give rise to a default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of termination, or remedy under the account or chattel paper.

Subject to (h) of this section, an account debtor may not waive or vary its option under (b)(3) of this section.

This section is subject to law other than this chapter that establishes a different rule for an account debtor who is an individual and who incurred the obligation primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

This section does not apply to an assignment of a health care insurance receivable.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am § 15 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in (e), added “, other than a sale under a disposition under AS

45.29.610

or an acceptance of collateral under AS

45.29.620

” at the end.

Sec. 45.29.407.
Restrictions on creation or enforcement of security interest in leasehold interest or in lessor’s residual interest.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section, a term in a lease agreement is ineffective to the extent that it

prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of a party to the lease to the assignment, transfer, creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of a security interest in an interest of a party under the lease contract or in the lessor’s residual interest in the goods; or

provides that the assignment, transfer, creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of the security interest may give rise to a default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of termination, or remedy under the lease.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.12.303(g)

, a term described in (a)(2) of this section is effective to the extent that there is

a transfer by the lessee of the lessee’s right of possession or use of the goods in violation of the term; or

a delegation of a material performance of either party to the lease contract in violation of the term.

The creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of a security interest in the lessor’s interest under the lease contract or the lessor’s residual interest in the goods is not a transfer that materially impairs the lessee’s prospect of obtaining return performance or materially changes the duty of or materially increases the burden or risk imposed on the lessee within the purview of AS

45.12.303(d)

unless, and then only to the extent that, enforcement actually results in a delegation of material performance of the lessor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.408.
Restrictions on assignment of promissory notes, health-care-insurance receivables, and certain general intangibles ineffective.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section, a term in a promissory note or in an agreement between an account debtor and a debtor that relates to a health care insurance receivable or a general intangible, including a contract, permit, license, or franchise, and that prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of the person obligated on the promissory note or the account debtor to the assignment or transfer of, or creation, attachment, or perfection of a security interest in the promissory note, health care insurance receivable, or general intangible is ineffective to the extent that the term

would impair the creation, attachment, or perfection of a security interest; or

provides that the assignment, transfer, creation, attachment, or perfection of the security interest may give rise to a default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of termination, or remedy under the promissory note, health care insurance receivable, or general intangible.

The provisions of (a) of this section apply to a security interest in a payment intangible or promissory note only if the security interest arises out of a sale of the payment intangible or promissory note, other than a sale under a disposition under AS

45.29.610

or an acceptance of collateral under AS

45.29.620

.

A rule of law, statute, or regulation that prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of a government, a governmental body or official, a person obligated on a promissory note, or an account debtor to the assignment or transfer of or creation of a security interest in a promissory note, health care insurance receivable, or general intangible, including a contract, permit, license, or franchise between an account debtor and a debtor, is ineffective to the extent that the rule of law, statute, or regulation

would impair the creation, attachment, or perfection of a security interest; or

provides that the assignment, transfer, creation, attachment, or perfection of the security interest may give rise to a default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of termination, or remedy under the promissory note, health-care-insurance receivable, or general intangible.

To the extent that a term in a promissory note or in an agreement between an account debtor and a debtor that relates to a health care insurance receivable or general intangible or a rule of law, statute, or regulation described in (c) of this section would be effective under law other than this chapter but is ineffective under (a) or (c) of this section, the creation, attachment, or perfection of a security interest in the promissory note, health care insurance receivable, or general intangible

is not enforceable against the person obligated on the promissory note or the account debtor;

does not impose a duty or obligation on the person obligated on the promissory note or the account debtor;

does not require the person obligated on the promissory note or the account debtor to recognize the security interest, pay or render performance to the secured party, or accept payment or performance from the secured party;

does not entitle the secured party to use or assign the debtor’s rights under the promissory note, health care insurance receivable, or general intangible, including related information or materials furnished to the debtor in the transaction giving rise to the promissory note, health care insurance receivable, or general intangible;

does not entitle the secured party to use, assign, possess, or have access to trade secrets or confidential information of the person obligated on the promissory note or the account debtor; and

does not entitle the secured party to enforce the security interest in the promissory note, health care insurance receivable, or general intangible.

This section prevails over inconsistent provisions of other statutes unless the other statute contains an exemption that refers specifically to this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am § 16 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in (b), added “, other than a sale under a disposition under AS

45.29.610

or an acceptance of collateral under AS

45.29.620

” at the end.

Sec. 45.29.409.
Restrictions on assignment of letter-of-credit rights ineffective.

A term in a letter of credit or a rule of law, statute, regulation, custom, or practice applicable to the letter of credit that prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of an applicant, issuer, or nominated person to a beneficiary’s assignment of or creation of a security interest in a letter-of-credit right is ineffective to the extent that the term or rule of law, statute, regulation, custom, or practice

would impair the creation, attachment, or perfection of a security interest in the letter-of-credit right; or

provides that the assignment, transfer, creation, attachment, or perfection of the security interest may give rise to a default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of termination, or remedy under the letter-of-credit right.

To the extent that a term in a letter of credit is ineffective under (a) of this section but would be effective under law other than this chapter or a custom or practice applicable to the letter of credit, to the transfer of a right to draw or otherwise demand performance under the letter of credit, or to the assignment of a right to proceeds of the letter of credit, the creation, attachment, or perfection of a security interest in the letter-of-credit right

is not enforceable against the applicant, issuer, nominated person, or transferee beneficiary;

imposes no duties or obligations on the applicant, issuer, nominated person, or transferee beneficiary; and

does not require the applicant, issuer, nominated person, or transferee beneficiary to recognize the security interest, pay or render performance to the secured party, or accept payment or other performance from the secured party.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)